Utah statutes.
77-3-11.   Undertaking, when broken -- Prosecution.
(1) The undertaking is broken if the person posting the bond violates the
conditions set by the court.
(2)  If the undertaking is broken and the county attorney produces evidence of
the violation to the district court where the undertaking was filed, the court
shall order an action on the undertaking to be commenced, and the county
attorney shall commence an action in the name of the state against the
principal sureties on the undertaking.
